test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [taolistel, taolisil]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [taolistelt, taolisilt]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [taolisteks, taolisiks]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: taolisteni
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: taolistena
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: taolisteta
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Com: taolistega
     #
     temake+Pron+Sg+Nom: temake
     temake+Pron+Sg+Gen: temakese
     temake+Pron+Sg+Par: temakest
     temake+Pron+Sg+Ill: [temakesse, temakesesse]
     temake+Pron+Sg+Ine: temakeses
     temake+Pron+Sg+Ela: temakesest
     temake+Pron+Sg+All: temakesele
     temake+Pron+Sg+Ade: temakesel
     temake+Pron+Sg+Abl: temakeselt
     temake+Pron+Sg+Tra: temakeseks
     temake+Pron+Sg+Trm: temakeseni
     temake+Pron+Sg+Ess: temakesena
     temake+Pron+Sg+Abe: temakeseta
     temake+Pron+Sg+Com: temakesega
     temake+Pron+Pl+Nom: temakesed
     temake+Pron+Pl+Gen: temakeste
     temake+Pron+Pl+Par: temakesi
     temake+Pron+Pl+Ill: [temakestesse, temakesisse]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Ine: [temakestes, temakesis]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Ela: [temakestest, temakesist]
     temake+Pron+Pl+All: [temakestele, temakesile]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Ade: [temakestel, temakesil]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Abl: [temakestelt, temakesilt]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Tra: [temakesteks, temakesiks]
     temake+Pron+Pl+Trm: temakesteni
     temake+Pron+Pl+Ess: temakestena
     temake+Pron+Pl+Abe: temakesteta
     temake+Pron+Pl+Com: temakestega
     #
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Nom: temakene
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Gen: temakese
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Par: temakest
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [temakesse, temakesesse]
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Ine: temakeses
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Ela: temakesest
     temakene+Pron+Sg+All: temakesele
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Ade: temakesel
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Abl: temakeselt
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Tra: temakeseks
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Trm: temakeseni
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Ess: temakesena
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Abe: temakeseta
     temakene+Pron+Sg+Com: temakesega
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Nom: temakesed
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Gen: temakeste
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Par: temakesi
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [temakestesse, temakesisse]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [temakestes, temakesis]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [temakestest, temakesist]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+All: [temakestele, temakesile]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [temakestel, temakesil]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [temakestelt, temakesilt]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [temakesteks, temakesiks]
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Trm: temakesteni
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Ess: temakestena
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Abe: temakesteta
     temakene+Pron+Pl+Com: temakestega
     #
     teine+Pron+Sg+Nom: teine
     teine+Pron+Sg+Gen: teise
     teine+Pron+Sg+Par: teist
     teine+Pron+Sg+Ill: [teisesse, teise]
     teine+Pron+Sg+Ine: teises
     teine+Pron+Sg+Ela: teisest
     teine+Pron+Sg+All: teisele
     teine+Pron+Sg+Ade: teisel
     teine+Pron+Sg+Abl: teiselt
     teine+Pron+Sg+Tra: teiseks
     teine+Pron+Sg+Trm: teiseni
     teine+Pron+Sg+Ess: teisena
     teine+Pron+Sg+Abe: teiseta
     teine+Pron+Sg+Com: teisega
     teine+Pron+Pl+Nom: teised
     teine+Pron+Pl+Gen: teiste
     teine+Pron+Pl+Par: teisi
     teine+Pron+Pl+Ill: teistesse
     teine+Pron+Pl+Ine: teistes
     teine+Pron+Pl+Ela: teistest
     teine+Pron+Pl+All: teistele
     teine+Pron+Pl+Ade: teistel
     teine+Pron+Pl+Abl: teistelt
     teine+Pron+Pl+Tra: teisteks
     teine+Pron+Pl+Trm: teisteni
     teine+Pron+Pl+Ess: teistena
     teine+Pron+Pl+Abe: teisteta
     teine+Pron+Pl+Com: teistega
     #
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Nom: esimene
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Gen: esimese
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Par: esimest
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [esimesesse, esimesse]
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Ine: esimeses
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Ela: esimesest
     esimene+Pron+Sg+All: esimesele
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Ade: esimesel
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Abl: esimeselt
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Tra: esimeseks
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Trm: esimeseni
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Ess: esimesena
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Abe: esimeseta
     esimene+Pron+Sg+Com: esimesega
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Nom: esimesed
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Gen: esimeste
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Par: esimesi
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [esimestesse, esimesisse]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [esimestes, esimesis]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [esimestest, esimesist]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+All: [esimestele, esimesile]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [esimestel, esimesil]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [esimestelt, esimesilt]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [esimesteks, esimesiks]
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Trm: esimesteni
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Ess: esimestena
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Abe: esimesteta
     esimene+Pron+Pl+Com: esimestega
     #
